Washington statutes.
RCW 1.50.040

Appearance of award—Inscription.

The Washington gift of life award shall consist of the seal of the state of Washington and be inscribed with the words: "For the greatest act of kindness in donating organs to save the lives of others."

[ 2015 c 8 s 4; 1999 c 264 s 3; 1998 c 59 s 5.]